Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1308.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3242, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3242. A. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher


Education may adopt a policy which allows a student to enroll in an


institution within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education and


allows a student to be eligible for resident tuition if the student:


1. a. Is a citizen of the United States,


b. Graduated from a public or private high school in this


state, and


c. Resided in this state with a parent or legal guardian


while attending classes at a public or private high



Req. No. 2753 Page 1


school in this state for at least two (2) years prior


to graduation; or


2. a. Graduated from a public or private high school in this


state;, and


2. Resided


b. Resided in this state with a parent or legal guardian


while attending classes at a public or private high


school in this state for at least two (2) years prior


to graduation.


B. To be eligible for the provisions of subsection A of this


section, an eligible student shall:


1. Satisfy admission standards as determined by the Oklahoma


State Regents for Higher Education for the appropriate type of


institution and have secured admission to, and enrolled in, an


institution within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education;


and


2. If the student cannot present to the institution valid


documentation of United States nationality or an immigration status


permitting study at a postsecondary institution:


a. provide to the institution a copy of a true and


correct application or petition filed with the United


States Citizenship and Immigration Services to


legalize the student’s immigration status, or



Req. No. 2753 Page 2


b. file an affidavit with the institution stating that


the student will file an application to legalize his


or her immigration status at the earliest opportunity


the student is eligible to do so, but in no case later


than:


(1) one (1) year after the date on which the student


enrolls for study at the institution, or


(2) if there is no formal process to permit children


of parents without lawful immigration status to


apply for lawful status without risk of


deportation, one (1) year after the date the


United States Citizenship and Immigration


Services provide provides such a formal process,


and


c. if the student files an affidavit pursuant to


subparagraph b of this paragraph, present to the


institution a copy of a true and correct application


or petition filed with the United States Citizenship


and Immigration Services no later than:


(1) one (1) year after the date on which the student


enrolls for study at the institution, or


(2) if there is no formal process to permit children


of parents without lawful immigration status to


apply for lawful status without risk of

Req. No. 2753 Page 3


deportation, one (1) year after the date the


United States Citizenship and Immigration


Services provide provides such a formal process,


which copy shall be maintained in the


institution’s records for that student.


C. Any student who completes the required criteria prescribed


in subsection A of this section, paragraph 1 of subsection B of this


section, and subparagraph a of paragraph 2 of subsection B of this


section shall not be disqualified on the basis of the student’s


immigration status from any scholarships or financial aid provided


by this state.


D. The provisions of this section shall not impose any


additional conditions to maintain resident tuition status at a


postsecondary educational institution within The Oklahoma State


System of Higher Education on a student who was enrolled in a degree


program and first received such resident tuition status at that


institution during the 2006-2007 school year or any prior year.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2753 EB 12/29/2025 10:39:03 AM

Req. No. 2753 Page 4